nl: Compatibele mondstukpatch: Inclusief patch; Niet aanbevolen/beperkte hechting; Werkt met patches; Overig
hr-HR: Kompatibilni flaster za usnik: Uključuje naljepnicu; Ne preporučuje se / ograničeno prianjanje; Kompatibilno s naljepnicama; Ostalo
fr: Protection de bec compatible: Protège-bec inclus; Non recommandé/adhérence limitée; Compatible avec les protège-becs; Autre
de: Kompatibles Mundstückspolster: Mit Bissplatte; Nicht empfohlen/eingeschränkte Haftung; Kompatibel mit Bissplatten; Sonstige
tr: Uyumlu ağızlık dişliği: Ped içerir; Önerilmez/sınırlı yapışma; Pedlerle kullanılabilir; Diğer
ru: Совместимая накладка на мундштук: Наклейка в комплекте; Не рекомендуется / слабое сцепление; Совместимо с наклейками; Другое
it: Patch per boccaglio compatibile: Include salvabocchino; Non consigliato/adesione limitata; Funziona con salvabocchini; Altro
ro-RO: Petic compatibil pentru muștiuc: Include protecție; Nerecomandat / aderență limitată; Funcționează cu protecții; Altele
hu: Kompatibilis szájrész tapasz: Védőtapasszal; Nem ajánlott/korlátozott tapadás; Védőtapaszokkal használható; Egyéb
cs: Kompatibilní náplast na náustek: Zahrnuje podložku; Nedoporučuje se / omezená přilnavost; Funguje s podložkami; Jiné
pt-BR: Protetor de boquilha compatível: Inclui protetor; Não recomendado/adesão limitada; Funciona com protetores; Outro
pl: Kompatybilna naklejka na ustnik: Zawiera naklejkę; Niezalecane / ograniczona przyczepność; Współpracuje z naklejkami na ustnik; Inne
es: Parche de boquilla compatible: Incluye parche; No recomendado/adherencia limitada; Funciona con parches; Otro
sl-SI: Združljiva obloga za ustnik: Vključuje obliž; Ni priporočljivo/omejen oprijem; Deluje z obliži; Drugo
el: Συμβατό επίθεμα επιστομίου: Περιλαμβάνει προστατευτικό; Δεν συνιστάται/περιορισμένη πρόσφυση; Λειτουργεί με προστατευτικά; Άλλο
nb: Kompatibel munnstykkelapp: Inkluderer patch; Ikke anbefalt / begrenset vedheft; Fungerer med patcher; Annet
th: แผ่นปิดปากที่เข้ากันได้: รวมแผ่นรอง; ไม่แนะนำ/การยึดติดจำกัด; ใช้ร่วมกับแผ่นรองได้; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: adesivo de bocal compatível: Inclui protetor; Não recomendado/adesão limitada; Funciona com protetores; Outro
sv: Kompatibel munstycke: Inkluderar bitplatta; Rekommenderas ej/begränsad vidhäftning; Fungerar med bitplattor; Övrigt
ko: 호환 마우스피스 패치: 패치 포함; 권장하지 않음/접착력 제한됨; 패치와 호환됨; 기타
zh-CN: 适配吹嘴贴片: 包含贴片; 不推荐/附着力有限; 兼容贴片; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместима лепенка за мундщук: Включва подложка; Не се препоръчва/ограничено залепване; Работи с подложки; Друго
zh-TW: 相容吹嘴貼片: 包含護片; 不建議/黏性有限; 可搭配護片使用; 其他
vi: Miếng đệm miệng tương thích: Có kèm miếng dán; Không khuyên dùng/độ bám dính kém; Dùng được miếng dán; Khác
en: Compatible mouthpiece patch: Includes patch; Not recommended/limited adhesion; Works with patches; Other
ja: 互換性のあるマウスピースパッチ: パッチ付属; 非推奨/接着力に制限あり; パッチ対応; その他
fi: Yhteensopiva suukappaleen paikka: Sisältää hammaspehmusteen; Ei suositella / rajoitettu tarttuvuus; Yhteensopiva hammaspehmusteiden kanssa; Muu
sk-SK: Kompatibilná nálepka na náustok: Obsahuje nálepku; Neodporúča sa/obmedzená priľnavosť; Funguje s nálepkami; Iné
lt-LT: Suderinama kandiklio pagalvėlė: Pridedama pagalvėlė; Nerekomenduojama / ribotas sukibimas; Tinka su pagalvėlėmis; Kita
da: Kompatibelt mundstykkeplaster: Mundstykkebeskytter medfølger; Anbefales ikke/begrænset klæbeevne; Fungerer med beskyttere; Andet